Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2434
Enforcement of act; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that in enforcing the provisions of the Livestock Waste Management Act the department shall give priority to the larger animal feeding operations in the state.

Laws 1998, LB 1209, § 14;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 54-2414;

Laws 2004, LB 916, § 23.